en: Rices, Rice
bg: Ориз
ca: Arrossos
cs: Rýže
da: Ris
de: Reise, Reis
es: Arroces, Arroz
fi: Riisit
fr: Riz
he: אורז
hr: riže, riža
hu: Rizsek
it: Riso
ja: 米
la: Oryza sativa
lt: Ryžiai
nb: Ris
nl: Rijst
nn: Ris
pl: Ryże
pt: Arrozes
ru: Рис
sv: Ris
zh: 米

en: Semi-milled rices, half-milled rices
fr: Riz semi-complet

en: Brown rices
bg: Кафяв ориз
da: Brune ris
de: Brauner Reis
es: Arroces integrales, Arroces cargo
fi: ruskeat riisit
fr: Riz complet, riz cargo, riz brun, Riz complet cru
hr: Smeđe riže
it: Riso integrale
ja: 玄米
lt: Rudieji ryžiai
nl: Zilverlvliesrijsten, Volkoren rijsten, Volkorenrijsten
sv: Bruna ris

en: Cooked brown rices
da: Kokte brune ris
fr: Riz complet cuit

en: Unsalted cooked brown rices
da: Usaltede kokte brune ris
fr: Riz complet cuit non salé

en: Paddy rices
de: Ungedroschener Reis
es: Arroces en cáscara, Arroces con cáscara, Arroces cáscara, Arroces paddy
fr: Riz paddy
hr: Neoljuštene riže

en: Parboiled rices
bg: Бланширан ориз
da: Parboiled ris
de: Gekochter Reis
es: Arroces vaporizados, Arroces sancochados, Arroces parboiled
fi: Parboiled-riisit
fr: Riz étuvé
hr: Prokuhane riže
it: Riso parboiled
lt: Plikyti ryžiai
nl: Parboiled rijsten, Inkaf gekookte rijst

en: Parboiled white rices
bg: Бланширан бял ориз
da: Parboiled hvide ris
fr: Riz blanc étuvé
hr: Prokuhana bijela riža

en: White rices
bg: Бял ориз
da: Hvide ris
de: Weißer Reis
es: Arroces blancos
fi: valkoiset riisit
fr: Riz blanc, riz usiné, riz blancho
hr: Bijele riže
it: Riso bianco
ja: 白米
lt: Baltieji ryžiai
nl: Witte rijst
pl: Ryż biały
sv: Vita ris

en: Unsalted cooked parboiled rice
fr: Riz blanc étuvé cuit non salé

en: Aromatic rices
bg: Ароматизиран ориз
de: Aromatischer Reis
es: Arroces aromáticos
fi: Aromaattiset riisit
fr: Riz parfumés, Riz parfumé
hr: Aromatične riže
it: Riso aromatico
nl: Geparfumeerde rijst
pt: Arrozes aromáticos

en: Glutinous rices, Sticky rices
de: Klebreis
es: Arroces glutinosos
fr: Riz gluant, riz glutineux, riz collant, riz doux
hr: Ljepljiva riža
nl: Paprijsten, Plakrijsten, Dessertrijsten, Dessert rijsten, Kleefrijsten, Ketan rijsten

en: Indica rices
de: Indica Reis
es: Arroces de la variedad índica
fi: indica-riisit
fr: Riz de variété indica
hr: Indica riže
it: Riso Indica
nl: Indica rijst
ru: Рис Индика

en: Japonica rices, Sinica rices
de: Japonica Reis
es: Arroces de la variedad japónica
fi: Japonica-riisit
fr: Riz de variété japonica
hr: Japonica riža
it: Risi Japonica
ja: ジャポニカ米
la: Oryza sativa japonica
nl: Japonica rijst

en: Long grain rices
bg: Дългозърнест ориз
ca: Arròs de gra llarg
da: Langkornede ris
de: Langkornreis
es: Arroces de grano largo
fi: pitkäjyväiset riisit
fr: Riz long grain, riz longs grains, Riz long
hr: Riže dugog zrna
it: Riso a grano lungo
lt: Ilgagrūdžiai ryžiai
nl: Langgraanrijst
pt: Arrozes agulha
sv: Långkorniga ris

en: Carolino rices
fr: Riz Carolino

en: Pilavlik rices, rice for pilaf
fr: Riz pilavlik, riz pour pilaf

en: Medium grain rices
da: Mediumkornede ris
de: Mittelkornreis
es: Arroces de grano medio, Arroces de grano semilargo
fr: Riz à grain médium, Riz à grain moyen
hr: Riže srednjeg zrna
it: Risi di grano medio
nl: Mediumgraanrijst
sv: Mellankorniga ris

en: Kolam rices
fr: Riz Kolam

en: Sona Masoori rices
fr: Riz Sona Masoori, riz Sona Mahsuri